Tennessee statutes. Title 2 Elections
Chapter 7

Procedure at the Polling Place

2-7-101. Officer of elections.

The officer of elections is in charge of and responsible for the conduct of all the elections being held at the polling place where such officer is the officer of elections. The officer is subject to the direction of the county election commission in the performance of such duties.

The officer of elections shall:

Maintain order at the polling place;

Assure that voting machines and voting compartments are arranged in such a way that the secrecy of the ballot is preserved and that no voter, on entering the polling place, comes near the voting machines or ballot boxes before the voter's eligibility to vote has been determined;

Keep each voting compartment provided with proper supplies for marking the ballots;

Have persons who are waiting to vote stand in line so that no person who is waiting is standing nearer than ten feet (10') to any voting machine or ballot box;

Report the breakdown of any voting machine to the voting machine technician; and

Ensure that each other election official performs such official's duties.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-701.

2-7-102. Judges.

During the time for voting, the judges shall distribute paper ballots, decide challenges to voters, serve in place of other election officials as directed by the officer of elections, and assist the officer of elections in such ways as the officer may direct.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-702.

2-7-103. Persons allowed in polling place.

No person may be admitted to a polling place while the procedures required by this chapter are being carried out except election officials, voters, persons properly assisting voters, the press, poll watchers appointed under § 2-7-104 and others bearing written authorization from the county election commission.

Candidates may be present after the polls close.

No police or other law enforcement officer may come nearer to the entrance to a polling place than ten feet (10') or enter the polling place except at the request of the officer of elections or the county election commission or to make an arrest or to vote.

No person may go into a voting machine or a voting booth while it is occupied by a voter except as expressly authorized by this title.

In addition to persons authorized to be admitted to the polling place in subsection (a), a child under seventeen (17) years of age may accompany the child's parent or legal guardian into the polling place. Such child may also enter the voting machine or voting booth with such parent or guardian to observe the voting process.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-703; Acts 1995, ch. 393, § 1.

2-7-104. Poll watchers.

Each political party and any organization of citizens interested in a question on the ballot or interested in preserving the purity of elections and in guarding against abuse of the elective franchise may appoint poll watchers. The county election commission may require organizations to produce evidence that they are entitled to appoint watchers. Each candidate in primary elections and each independent candidate in general elections may appoint one (1) or more poll watchers for each polling place; provided, however, at any given time, each such candidate shall have not more than one (1) such poll watcher on duty at each polling place. All appointments of watchers shall be in writing and signed by the persons or organizations authorized to make the appointment. All poll watchers' names shall be submitted to the county election commission no later than twelve o'clock (12:00) noon of the second working day before the election. All appointed poll watchers must have reached seventeen (17) years of age by election day and be residents of this state. A spouse of a candidate on the ballot shall not be eligible for appointment as a poll watcher.

Each political party which has candidates in the election and each citizens' organization may have two (2) watchers at each polling place. One (1) of the watchers representing a party may be appointed by the chair of the county executive committee of the party and the other by a majority of the candidates of that party running exclusively within the county in which the watchers are appointed. If the candidates of a party fail to appoint the watchers by twelve o'clock (12:00) noon on the third day before the election, the chair of the county executive committee of the party may appoint both watchers representing the chair's party. In addition, each candidate in a general election may appoint one (1) or more poll watchers for each polling place; provided, however, at any given time, each such candidate shall have not more than one (1) such poll watcher on duty at each polling place.

Upon arrival at the polling place, a watcher shall display such watcher's appointment to the officer of elections and sign the register of watchers. Poll watchers may be present during all proceedings at the polling place governed by this chapter. They may watch and inspect the performance in and around the polling place of all duties under this title. A watcher may, through the judges, challenge any person who offers to vote in the election. A watcher may also inspect all ballots while being called and counted and all tally sheets and poll lists during preparation and certification. A poll watcher who wishes to protest any aspect of the conduct of the election shall present such protest to the officer of elections or to the county election commission or to an inspector. The officer of elections or county election commission shall rule promptly upon the presentation of any protest and take any necessary corrective action.

No watcher may interfere with any voter in the preparation or casting of such voter's ballot or prevent the election officials' performance of their duties. No watcher may observe the giving of assistance in voting to a voter who is entitled to assistance. Watchers shall wear poll watcher badges with their names and their organization's name but no campaign material advocating voting for candidates or positions on questions.

Poll watchers observing the duties of the absentee counting board shall not leave the room, or place of counting, after the actual counting of the ballots has begun. Poll watchers observing the duties of the absentee counting board are prohibited from possessing any electronic device, including a cellular telephone or pager, capable of transmitting election results to a location outside the room where the ballots are being tabulated.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; 1978, ch. 754, § 3; T.C.A., § 2-704; Acts 1981, ch. 478, § 16; 1988, ch. 933, § 11; 1997, ch. 558, §§ 19, 31, 32; 2000, ch. 756, § 13; 2001, ch. 413, § 4; 2007, ch. 125, § 5; 2016, ch. 827, § 3; 2019, ch. 250, § 3.

Amendments. The 2016 amendment added the last sentence in (a).

The 2019 amendment, effective October 1, 2019, added “and be residents of this state” at the end of the sixth sentence of (a).

Effective Dates. Acts 2016, ch. 827, § 7. April 21, 2016.

Acts 2019, ch. 250, § 9. October 1, 2019.

2-7-105. Election officials — Vacancies — Administration of oath — Compensation.

The election officials of each polling place shall meet at the polling place at least one-half (½) hour before the time for opening the polls for the election.

If any election official fails to appear at the polling place, the officer of elections or, in such officer's absence, a majority of the election officials attending shall select other persons to fill the vacancies. The persons selected shall be registered voters of the county for which they are to serve. Any person selected to fill a vacancy shall be, to the extent practicable, of the same political party as the person in whose place such person was selected.

The officer of elections or, in such officer's absence, the oldest election official in age who has taken the oath shall administer the oath of § 2-1-111 to the persons filling vacancies and to any other official who has not taken the oath.

The officer of elections shall notify the county election commission of all vacancies.

Persons appointed to vacancies shall be compensated at the same rate as others performing the job to which they are appointed.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-705; Acts 1997, ch. 558, § 29.

2-7-106. Failure of all officials to appear — Appointment of replacements to election commission — Voting pending appointment.

If the county election commission receives notice that no election officials are at the polling place, the commission shall promptly appoint new officials who shall conduct the election. Until the polling place is open for voting, any voter who is eligible to vote there may vote at the county election commission office; ballots cast under this section shall be counted by the county election commission.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-706.

2-7-107. Delivery of election supplies.

The officer of elections shall deliver to the polling place on the day of the election the duplicate permanent registration records, paper ballots, sample ballots, voting machine keys, ballot boxes and keys, and all other supplies needed for the conduct of the election.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-707.

2-7-108. Lost, stolen or destroyed ballots — Replacement — Wrong voting machines delivered — Written report of circumstances.

If the ballots for a polling place are lost, stolen, destroyed, not delivered to the polling place or the supply of paper ballots is insufficient for any reason, the officer of elections shall notify the county election commission immediately after learning of this fact. The commission shall provide replacements for the missing or destroyed ballots by delivering the ballots reserved under § 2-5-209 and by having such additional ballots prepared as may be necessary.

If paper ballots or voting machines or both are delivered to the wrong polling place, the officer of elections shall notify the county election commission upon discovery of the error. The commission shall immediately have the proper ballots or voting machines delivered. Pending the arrival of the correct voting machines, the officer of elections shall proceed under § 2-7-119 as if the machines were out of order.

At the close of the polls, the officer of elections shall make a written report of the circumstances causing the officer's action under this section to the county election commission which may make additions to the report and shall then transmit it to the grand jury of the county.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-708.

2-7-109. Ballot boxes — Locked during voting.

The officer of elections shall show the ballot box to the judges who shall verify that it is empty, and the officer shall then lock the ballot box before the polling place is open for voting. The ballot box shall remain locked until the votes are to be counted after voting has ended.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-709.

2-7-110. Examination and final preparation of machines.

The officer shall give the sealed voting machine keys to the judges to prepare the machines for voting. The envelope containing the keys may not be opened until the judges have examined it to see that it has not been opened and that the number registered on the protective counter and the number on the seal with which the machine is sealed correspond with the numbers written on the envelope containing the keys.

If the envelope has been torn open, or if the numbers do not correspond, or if any other discrepancy is found, the judges shall immediately inform the voting machine technician of the facts. The voting machine technician or the technician's assistant shall promptly examine the machine and certify whether it is properly arranged.

If the number on the seal and the protective counter are found to agree with the numbers on the envelope, the judges shall then open the door concealing the counters and carefully examine every counter to see that it registers zero (000) and shall also allow the watchers to examine them. The judges shall then sign a certificate showing the delivery of the keys in a sealed envelope, the number on the seal, the number registered on the protective counter, that all the counters are set at zero (000), and that the ballot labels are properly placed in the machine.

If any counter is found not to register at zero (000) and if it is impracticable for the voting machine technician to arrive in time to adjust the counters before the time set for opening the polls, the judges shall immediately make a written statement of the designating letter and number, if any, of such counter, together with the number registered thereon, and shall sign and post the statement on the wall of the polling place where it shall remain throughout the election day. In filling out the tally sheets, they shall subtract such number from the number then registered on such counter.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-710.

2-7-111. Posting of sample ballots and instructions — Arrangement of polling place — Restrictions.

The officer of elections shall have the sample ballots, voting instructions, and other materials, which are to be posted, placed in conspicuous positions inside the polling place for the use of voters. The county election commission shall designate entrances to the building in which the election is to be held that are for the use of voters. The officer shall measure off one hundred feet (100') from the designated entrances and place boundary signs at that distance.

Within the appropriate boundary as established in subsection (a), and the building in which the polling place is located, the display of campaign posters, signs or other campaign materials, distribution of campaign materials, and solicitation of votes for or against any person, political party, or position on a question are prohibited. No campaign posters, signs or other campaign literature may be displayed on or in any building in which a polling place is located.

Except in a county with a population of not less than eight hundred twenty-five thousand (825,000) nor more than eight hundred thirty thousand (830,000) according to the 1990 federal census or any subsequent federal census, a solicitation or collection for any cause is prohibited. This does not include the normal activities that may occur at such polling place such as a church, school, grocery, etc.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit any person from wearing a button, cap, hat, pin, shirt, or other article of clothing outside the established boundary but on the property where the polling place is located.

The officer of elections shall have each official wear a badge with that official's name and official title.

With the exception of counties having a metropolitan form of government, any county having a population over six hundred thousand (600,000) according to the 1970 federal census or any subsequent federal census, and counties having a population of between two hundred fifty thousand (250,000) and two hundred sixty thousand (260,000) by the 1970 census, any county may, by private act, extend the one hundred foot (100') boundary provided in this section.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-711; Acts 1980, ch. 543, §§ 1, 2; 1987, ch. 362, §§ 1, 2, 4; 1993, ch. 465, §§ 1, 2; 1993, ch. 518, §§ 11, 21; 1994, ch. 582, § 1; 2003, ch. 307, § 6; 2019, ch. 90, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. This section was held unconstitutional in Freeman v. Burson, 802 S.W.2d 210 (Tenn. 1990). See heading “Constitutionality” under Notes to Decisions. However, the decision by the Tennessee supreme court was reversed on appeal by the United States supreme court on May 26, 1992. See Burson v. Freeman, 504 U.S. 191, 112 S. Ct. 1846, 119 L. Ed 2d 5 (1992).

For tables of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment, in (a), added the second sentence, and substituted “designated entrances” for “entrances to the building in which the election is to be held” in the last sentence.

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 90, § 2. March 28, 2019.

Cross-References. Violation of this section a misdemeanor, §2-19-119.

Attorney General Opinions. Extension of boundary at polling place prohibited, OAG 97-128 (9/22/97).

The 100 foot “campaign-free” zone on election day does not extend to private property adjacent to and within 100 feet of the entrance to the polling place, OAG 02-118 (10/24/02).

2-7-112. Procedure for voting.

A voter shall complete and sign an application for ballot, indicate the primary in which the voter desires to vote, if any, and present it to a precinct registrar. In addition, the voter shall present to the precinct registrar one (1) form of identification that bears the name and photograph of the voter. The requirement to present one (1) form of identification that bears the name and photograph of the voter shall apply to persons voting pursuant to § 2-6-109; provided, however, that a person voting in accordance with § 2-6-401(a) and (b) or § 2-6-601 shall not be required to show an identification with a photograph of the voter. The application for ballot shall include a space for the address of the voter's current residence, and the voter shall write or print such address on the application when the voter signs the application for ballot.

Using the computerized voter signature list or the electronic poll book, the registrar shall make a determination whether the voter's address is different from the address on the voter's permanent registration record or if the registration is in inactive status. If the voter has changed residence, or the voter's registration is inactive, the registrar shall follow the procedures for voting pursuant to §§ 2-7-140 and 2-7-141.

To verify the voter's identification, the voter shall supply evidence of identification specified in subsection (c).

If, upon verification of evidence of identification, it is found that the applicant is entitled to vote, the registrar shall initial the application, note the date of the election, the number on the voter's ballot application, and the primary or general election in which the voter applies to vote.

If the applicant's signature is illegible, the registrar shall print the name on the application.

The county election commission shall use either a computerized voter signature list or an electronic poll book that has been approved for use by the coordinator of elections. A computerized voter signature list shall include the voter's name, current address of residence, social security number or voter identification number, birth date and a space for the voter's signature, elections voted, application or ballot stub number, or both, and precinct registrar's initials. The electronic poll book shall contain the same information as on the computerized voter signature list in an electronic format and provide a place on its screen for the precinct registrar to record elections voted, application or ballot stub number, or both, the precinct registrar's initials and a place for the voter's signature.

For those counties using the computerized voter signature list, the following procedures shall be followed:

After completing the application for ballot, the voter shall sign the computerized voter signature list, and the registrar shall compare the voter's signature and information on the signature list with the information on the application for ballot; and

If, upon comparison of the information, the registrar determines that the voter is entitled to vote, the registrar shall initial the computerized voter signature list and shall give the voter the ballot application, which is the voter's authorization to vote.

For those counties using the electronic poll book, the following procedure shall be followed: After completing the application for ballot which shall include the voter's signature, if, upon comparison of the information, the registrar determines that the voter is entitled to vote, the registrar shall initial the application for ballot and shall give the voter the ballot application, which is the voter's authorization to vote.

A person shall be entitled to vote a provisional ballot under the procedures of this section if the voter claims to be properly registered in the county and eligible to vote at the precinct in the election, but whose eligibility cannot be determined by the computer signature list or by examination of the permanent registration records on file with the county election commission; an election official asserts the individual is not registered to vote; or the voter has requested a ballot pursuant to § 2-6-202. If a voter is unable to present evidence of identification, the voter shall be entitled to vote a provisional ballot pursuant to subsection (e) unless the voter is eligible to vote pursuant to subsection (f).

If the election official cannot determine that the voter's name should have been placed on the precinct's computer signature list, then the voter shall complete an original voter registration application. At the time of registration and pursuant to subsection (d), the voter shall present verification of the residential address under which the person desires to vote.

After the voter has completed the voter registration application and supplied verification of the voter's residential address, the voter shall complete an application for ballot pursuant to this section.

Upon completion of the application for ballot, the voter shall be given a provisional ballot and provisional ballot envelope. The provisional ballot envelope shall be of a different color from absentee ballot envelopes and shall bear a detachable slip that contains the provisional ballot affidavit. The provisional ballot affidavit shall contain the voter's printed name, social security number, date of birth, signature and any other identifying information deemed necessary by the coordinator of elections to satisfy the requirements of this section and to prevent fraudulent registration and voting.

Both the voter registration application and the application for ballot shall be deposited in the provisional ballot box. Nothing in this section shall be construed to allow election day voter registration.

Pursuant to § 2-7-114(b) and (c), the voter shall vote the provisional ballot. Any county utilizing punchcard or optiscan technology shall process their ballots pursuant to rules promulgated by the state coordinator of elections. The provisions of § 2-7-116 shall govern any voter needing assistance.

Along with the voter registration applications and the applications for ballot completed by provisional voters, all provisional ballots that have been cast shall remain sealed and locked in the absentee ballot box for return to the county election commission at the close of polls.

All provisional ballots shall be counted at the county election commission office by a separate central absentee ballot counting board that has been appointed in like manner to the central absentee ballot counting board established under § 2-6-302 and known as the central provisional ballot counting board. Upon completion of the counting of the absentee ballots, the county election commission may designate the central absentee ballot counting board established under § 2-6-302 as the central provisional ballot counting board. If the county election commission determines that there are fewer than one hundred (100) provisional ballots to be counted, the county election commission may act as the central provisional ballot counting board without additional compensation. When provisional ballots have been cast utilizing punchcard or optiscan technology, the counting of the provisional ballots shall be pursuant to rules promulgated by the state coordinator of elections.

After the delivery of the absentee ballot boxes containing provisional ballots to the county election commission, the central provisional ballot counting board shall unlock and open each absentee ballot box from the polling places in the presence of a majority of the judges.

The central provisional ballot counting board shall examine the records of the county election commission and the records of the Tennessee departments of health, human services, mental health and substance abuse services, intellectual and developmental disabilities, safety and veterans services with respect to all provisional ballots. The central provisional ballot counting board shall then determine if the person voting that ballot was entitled to vote and met the statutory requirements for registration at the precinct where the person cast a vote in the election. The central provisional ballot counting board shall also determine that the person has not already cast a ballot in the election.

If the central provisional ballot counting board determines that the person should have been registered to vote and met the statutory requirements for registration in the precinct where the voter cast the ballot and the voter has not cast a ballot in the election in a different precinct, then the central provisional ballot counting board shall remove the provision ballot affidavit from the provisional ballot envelope and place the sealed ballot with all other provisional ballots that have been determined to be countable.

If the central provisional ballot counting board determines that the person should not have been registered to vote in the precinct where the voter cast the ballot or that the voter has previously cast a ballot in the election in a different precinct, the provisional ballot envelope shall not be opened nor its provisional ballot affidavit removed, but it shall be marked “Rejected” across its face with the reason for rejection written on it and signed by at least two (2) members of the central provisional ballot counting board. It shall then be placed in the container of rejected absentee ballots. A list shall be made of such rejected ballots, and the administrator shall notify the voters by mail of the rejection and the reason for such rejection.

The counting of all provisional ballots must be completed within four (4) business days of the close of polls on election day. If the county election commission determines that the counting of provisional ballots cannot be completed by the designated time, the state coordinator of elections may grant the county an extension of time and designate a time that shall be no later than the third Monday after the election.

If the county election commission determines that the counting of provisional ballots cannot be completed during the night of election day and upon the close of each counting session, the absentee ballot boxes containing the provisional ballots must be locked and sealed in the same manner established in § 2-6-311. The ballot boxes may not be unlocked except when the central provisional ballot counting board is performing its duties in compliance with this section.

If a voter is disabled so as to be unable to write a signature or make a mark, the registrar shall write the voter's name where needed and shall indicate that this has been done by putting the registrar's initials immediately after the name.

For purposes of verifying the person's identification on the application for ballot, “evidence of identification” shall be:

A Tennessee driver license;

Except as provided in subdivision (c)(2)(B), a valid identification card issued by the state of Tennessee, or the United States where authorized by law to issue personal identification; provided, that such identification card contains a photograph of the voter;

An identification card issued to a student by an institution of higher education containing a photograph of a student shall not be evidence of identification for purposes of verifying the person's identification on the application for ballot;

A valid identification card issued pursuant to § 55-50-336;

A valid United States passport;

A valid employee identification card issued by the state of Tennessee, or the United States where authorized by law to issue employee identification; provided, that such identification card contains a photograph of the voter;

A valid United States military identification card; provided, that such identification card contains a photograph of the voter; or

An employee identification card for retired state employees authorized pursuant to § 8-50-118.

For purposes of registering a person to vote pursuant to subdivision (a)(3), “verification of residential address” shall include, but is not limited to, a Tennessee driver license, a residential lease agreement, a utility bill or other document bearing the applicant's residential address. Such verification may be on the same or different document from those listed in subsection (c).

A person whose name appears on the computerized voter signature list or the electronic poll book and is unable to present valid evidence of identification specified in subsection (c) shall be entitled to vote a provisional ballot under the procedures of this subsection (e) unless such person is eligible to vote pursuant to subsection (f).

The voter shall complete an application for ballot pursuant to this section, and if the voter has changed residence, or the voter's registration is inactive, the voter shall complete a fail safe affidavit. The voter must vote in the precinct in which the person is a resident. The voter shall also be given a written statement that specifies the voter has until the second business day after the election to provide evidence of identification. The voter shall sign such statement and return it along with the application of ballot.

Upon completion of the application for ballot and if applicable, the presentation of a fail safe affidavit in the voter's correct polling location, the voter shall be given a provisional ballot and provisional ballot envelope. The provisional ballot envelope shall be a different color from the absentee ballot envelopes and shall bear a detachable slip that contains the provisional ballot affidavit. The provisional ballot affidavit shall contain the voter's printed name, social security number, date of birth, signature and any other identifying information deemed necessary by the coordinator of elections to satisfy the requirements of this section and to prevent fraudulent voting. The application for ballot shall be deposited in the provisional ballot box.

Pursuant to § 2-7-114(b) and (c), the voter shall vote the provisional ballot. Any county utilizing optical scan technology shall process their ballots pursuant to rules promulgated by the state coordinator of elections. Section 2-7-116 shall govern any voter needing assistance.

Along with the applications for ballot completed by provisional voters, all provisional ballots that have been cast shall remain sealed and locked in the provisional ballot box for return to the county election commission at the close of polls.

Provisional ballots cast pursuant to this subsection (e) shall only be counted if the voter provides evidence of identification specified in subsection (c) to the administrator of elections or the administrator's designee by the close of business on the second business day after the election. Evidence of identification must be presented at the voter's county election commission office or another location designated by the county election commission.

Upon the voter presenting valid evidence of identification, set forth in subsection (c), to the administrator of elections or the administrator's designee, the voter shall sign an affidavit, prescribed by the coordinator of elections, containing the voter's name, signature and any other information deemed necessary by the coordinator of elections to satisfy the requirements of this section and to prevent fraudulent voting. The affidavit shall also contain a statement affirming under the penalty of perjury that the voter is the same individual that cast the provisional ballot. A photocopy of the evidence of identification shall be attached to the affidavit.

The central provisional ballot counting board shall compare the information on the provisional affidavit envelope to the information set forth in subdivision (e)(6). If it is determined that the person provided proper evidence of identification, then the central provisional counting board shall remove the provisional ballot affidavit from the provisional ballot envelope and place the sealed ballot with all provisional ballots to be counted.

If the voter does not provide valid evidence of identification in a timely manner, the provisional ballot envelope shall not be opened nor its provisional ballot affidavit removed, but shall be marked “Rejected” across its face with the reason for rejection written on it and signed by at least two (2) members of the central provisional ballot counting board. The board members signing the provisional ballot affidavit may not be of the same political party. It shall then be placed in the container of rejected ballots. The administrator shall notify the voters by mail of the rejection and the reason for such rejection.

The central provisional ballot counting board shall have until the close of business on the fourth business day after the election to count any provisional ballot cast pursuant to this subsection (e). If the county election commission determines that the counting of provisional ballots cannot be completed by the designated time, the state coordinator of elections may grant the county an extension of time and designate a time that shall be no later than the second Monday after the election.

A voter who is indigent and unable to obtain proof of identification without payment of a fee or who has a religious objection to being photographed shall be required to execute an affidavit of identity on a form provided by the county election commission and then shall be allowed to vote. The affidavit shall state that:

The person executing the affidavit is the same individual who is casting the ballot; and

The affiant is indigent and unable to obtain proof of identification without paying a fee or has a religious objection to being photographed.

An identification card issued by a county or municipality or entity thereof, including a public library, containing a photograph shall not be evidence of identification for purposes of verifying the person's identification on the application for ballot.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; 1977, ch. 365, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-712; Acts 1984, ch. 935, §§ 4-6; 1989, ch. 590, §§ 4, 5; 1990, ch. 727, § 3; 1997, ch. 550, § 8; 2003, ch. 352, §§ 1-3; 2008, ch. 928, § 14; 2008, ch. 1019, § 1; 2009, ch. 218, § 5; 2010, ch. 1100, § 1; 2011, ch. 323, §§ 1-8; 2011, ch. 386, § 1; 2012, ch. 575, § 1; 2012, ch. 938, § 2; 2013, ch. 178, §§ 1-3; 2013, ch. 231, § 9; 2015, ch. 24, § 7; 2018, ch. 726, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2010, ch. 1100, § 153 provided that the commissioner of mental health and developmental disabilities, the commissioner of mental health, the commissioner of intellectual and developmental disabilities, and the commissioner of finance and administration are authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of the act. All such rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the provisions of the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Acts 2015, ch. 24, § 7 provided that the Tennessee Code Commission is requested to change references in Tennessee Code Annotated, as volumes are replaced and supplements are issued, from "veterans' affairs" and "veterans affairs" to "veterans services" wherever the language appears in reference to the name or commissioner of the Tennessee department of veterans services.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment substituted “veterans services” for “veterans affairs” in the first sentence of (a)(3)(B)(iii).

The 2018 amendment, at the end of the first sentence of (a)(3)(A), substituted “; an election official asserts the individual is not registered to vote; or the voter has requested a ballot pursuant to §2-6-202” for “or an election official asserts that the individual is not eligible to vote”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2015, ch. 24, § 9. July 1, 2015.

Acts 2018, ch. 726, § 3. April 18, 2018.

Cross-References.

Electors privileged from arrest while voting and on way to and from polling place, Tenn. Const., art. IV, § 3.

Offense of perjury, penalties, title 39, chapter 16, part 7.

Law Reviews.

Changing Focus and Exposing a Solution: Using Section 2 of the Voting Rights Act to Defeat Tennessee's Voter Photo ID Law, (Emma Redden), 44 U. Mem. L. Rev. 229 (2013).

College Students and State Voter ID Laws: Can I Vote in the State Where I Attend College? I Have a Student ID Card, 45 U. Mem. L. Rev. 331 (2014).

Constitutional Law — Suffrage and the State's Interest in Preventing Fraud — The Constitutionality of Tennessee's Photo Identification Requirement Under Strict Scrutiny, 81 Tenn. L. Rev. 929 (2014).

Fearing Fear Itself: Photo Identification Laws, Fear of Fraud, and the Fundamental Right to Vote (Joel A. Heller), 62 Vand. L. Rev. 1871 (2009).

Rethinking the Right to Vote Under State Constitutions, 67 Vand. L. Rev. En Banc 189 (2014).

The Right to Vote Under State Constitutions (Joshua A. Douglas), 67 Vand. L. Rev. 89 (2014).

Viewing Tennessee's New Photo Identification Requirements for Voters Through Historical And National Lens (Daniel Sullivan), 9 Tenn. J. L. & Pol'y 135 (2013).

Eliminating Barriers to Voting: How Allowing College Students to Use Their Student IDs to Vote in Certain Southeastern States Can Help Make Voting Great in America, 49 U. Mem. L. Rev. 1185 (Summer 2019).

Finding Common Ground on Voter ID Laws, 49 U. Mem. L. Rev. 1233 (Summer 2019).

Attorney General Opinions. Voter identification, constitutionality, OAG 87-186 (12/14/87)

Constitutionality of requiring voter photo identification. OAG 11-34, 2011 Tenn. AG LEXIS 36 (4/12/11).

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 10 Tenn. Juris., Elections, §§ 6, 11.

2-7-113. Voting by machine.

When the voter is to vote by voting machine, the voter shall then present the ballot application to the machine operator, enter the machine, and vote by marking the ballot and operating the machine.

The machine operator shall file the ballot applications in order of presentation and shall permit the voter to operate the machine for those elections in which the voter is entitled to vote.

The machine operator shall, upon demand of any voter before the voter enters the machine, tell the voter the order of the offices on the ballot and fully instruct the voter on how to operate the machine.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-713.